Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-14,108
Commission; members; file a statement of financial interests; when.

Each person appointed to the commission by the Governor or the Secretary of State shall file with the commission a statement of financial interests, pursuant to sections 49-1493 to 49-14,104, prior to assuming his or her duties or prior to the legislative confirmation hearing, whichever occurs first.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 108;

Laws 1990, LB 534, § 4.